Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3758.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 144.218, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 5a. new text end new text begin Modifying sex indicated in original birth record. new text end new text begin (a) Notwithstanding subdivisions 4 and 5 and except as provided in paragraph (b), the state registrar or a local registrar must not, for a birth record subject under 18 years of age, register a replacement birth record in which the subject's sex is different from the sex indicated in the subject's original birth record. new text end new text begin (b) The state registrar or a local registrar may, for a birth record subject under 18 years of age, register a replacement birth record in which the subject's sex is different from the sex indicated in the subject's original birth record if the sex indicated in the subject's original birth record was recorded in error and the change is necessary to correct the error. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 144.2181, is amended to read: 144.2181 AMENDMENT AND CORRECTION OF VITAL RECORDS. (a) A vital record registered under sections 144.212 to 144.227 may be amended or corrected only according to sections 144.212 to 144.227 and rules adopted by the commissioner of health to protect the integrity and accuracy of vital records. (b)(1) A vital record that is amended under this section shall indicate that it has been amended, except as otherwise provided in this section or by rule. (2) Electronic documentation shall be maintained by the state registrar that identifies the evidence upon which the amendment or correction was based, the date of the amendment or correction, and the identity of the authorized person making the amendment or correction. (c) Upon receipt of a certified copy of an order of a court of competent jurisdiction changing the name of a person whose birth is registered in Minnesota and upon request of such person if 18 years of age or older or having the status of emancipated minor, the state registrar shall amend the birth record to show the new name. If the person is a minor or an incapacitated person then a parent, guardian, or legal representative of the minor or incapacitated person may make the request. (d) When an applicant does not submit the minimum documentation required for amending a vital record or when the state registrar has cause to question the validity or completeness of the applicant's statements or the documentary evidence, and the deficiencies are not corrected, the state registrar shall not amend the vital record. The state registrar shall advise the applicant of the reason for this action and shall further advise the applicant of the right of appeal to a court with competent jurisdiction over the Department of Health. new text begin (e) The state registrar or a local registrar must not amend the sex indicated in the birth record of a person under 18 years of age, unless the sex indicated in the person's original birth record was recorded in error and the amendment is necessary to correct the error. new text end